Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2012
Department; patrol; adopt rules and regulations.

The department and the patrol shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out their responsibilities under the Missing Children Identification Act.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 88.